Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1102
Judge; eligibility.

No person shall be eligible for the office of judge of the Court of Appeals unless he or she (1) is at the time of consideration for appointment a resident of Nebraska, (2) is at least thirty years of age, (3) is a citizen of the United States, (4) has been engaged in the practice of law in the State of Nebraska for at least five years which may include prior service as a judge, and (5) is currently admitted to practice before the Nebraska Supreme Court.

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 2.